Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 41 Local Correctional Facilities
12-41-807. Operating fund account.

There is hereby established an operating fund account not to exceed the amount of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) per annum, the express purpose of which is to provide a supplement to the local operations fund for the continuing operation of secure facilities for juveniles as alternatives to placement of juveniles in adult detention facilities.

(1)The allowable uses of the operating fund account shall be to provide up to but not to exceed one-third (1/3) of the annual operations costs for a juvenile detention facility as authorized in this subchapter.

The funds shall be applied for the continuing operations of juvenile detention facilities as authorized in this subchapter together with such other general funds, if any, as may be provided by any governing body individually or in combination with each other, as established for the purposes authorized in this subchapter.

The Division of Youth Services shall promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions of this section.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 486, § 7; 2019, No. 315, § 915.

12-41-808. Abatement of loan balances.

Any loan balances accrued pursuant to the revolving loan fund account are abated.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1468, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The revolving loan fund account established pursuant to former §12-41-805 has been repealed by Acts 2001, No. 1468, § 1.

12-41-809. Juvenile detention centers or facilities.

Juvenile detention centers or juvenile detention facilities shall operate to provide pretrial detention and short term sanctions as provided for in § 9-27-330.

The Division of Youth Services of the Department of Human Services has no obligation to utilize or fund juvenile detention centers or juvenile detention facilities.

Effective Dates. Acts 1877, No. 73, § 16: effective on passage.

Acts 1881, No. 81, § 16: effective on passage.

Acts 1883, No. 78, § 6: effective on passage.

Acts 1893, No. 120, § 5: effective on passage.

Acts 1899, No. 111, § 5: effective on passage.

Acts 1939, No. 118, § 9: approved Feb. 22, 1939. Emergency clause provided: “It is determined by the General Assembly that many counties, cities, and towns in the State of Arkansas do not have facilities for the safe-keeping of prisoners convicted of misdemeanor cases and that many prisoners convicted of misdemeanor cases are now abused because of being leased into private industry; therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, will be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1961, No. 254, § 3: approved Mar. 14, 1961. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby determined that there exist in the State of Arkansas certain counties having inadequate county farm facilities which affect the health and welfare of the citizens of said counties, and the health and welfare of the State of Arkansas, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the peace, health, and safety of the people of the State of Arkansas an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall take effect and be in full force from and after the passage.”

History.

Acts 2001, No. 1468, § 3.